src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON f1b ! skam
 +N+Fem+Sg:mX4 0-a    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg:m   en     ; ! skammen !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:m   er-ene ;
        +N:    R      ;

LEXICON f1X ! bok
 +N+Fem+Sg:   0-a    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg:   en     ; ! boken !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:Z1 er-ene ;
        +N:   R      ;

LEXICON f1V ! mus
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en    ; ! musen !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl: 0-ene ;
        +N: R     ;

LEXICON f2
  f1 ;


LEXICON f3 ! lever
 +N+Fem+Sg:X1 0-a      ; ! lever, levra
 +N+Msc+Sg:   en       ; ! leveren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:X1 e-er-ene ; ! levre/levrer, levrene. Mangler levere
        +N:   R        ;

LEXICON f3b ! søster
 +N+Fem+Sg:   0-a      ; ! søster, søstera
 +N+Msc+Sg:   en       ; ! søsteren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:X1 e-er-ene ;
        +N:   R        ;

LEXICON fGLO
 +N+Fem+Sg:   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg:   en    ; ! gloen !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:Z1 r-rne ;
        +N:   R     ;

LEXICON fDATTER
          +N+Fem+Sg+Indef:datter   K ;
 !          +N+Fem+Sg+Def:datra    K ;
            +N+Fem+Sg+Def:dattera  K ;
            +N+Msc+Sg+Def:datteren K ;
!   +N+Fem+Sg+Def+Radical:datra    K ;
          +N+Fem+Pl+Indef:døtre    K ;
          +N+Fem+Pl+Indef:døtrer   K ;
            +N+Fem+Pl+Def:døtrene  K ;
 N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG+Indef:dotter   K ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG+Def:dottera  K ;
!                      +N:         R ;

!LEXICON fSØSTER
!          +N+Fem+Sg+Indef:søster   K ;
!            +N+Fem+Sg+Def:datra    K ;
!            +N+Msc+Sg+Def:datteren K ;
!!   +N+Fem+Sg+Def+Radical:datra    K ;
!          +N+Fem+Pl+Indef:døtre    K ;
!            +N+Fem+Pl+Def:døtrene  K ;
!  +N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG+Indef:dotter   K ;
!    +N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG+Def:dotra    K ;
!!                      +N:         R ;

LEXICON fMOR
     +N+Fem+Sg:mor   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def:moren K     ;
    +N+Fem+Pl:mødr  e-ene ;

LEXICON mFOT
    +N+Msc+Sg:fot   0-en   ;
    +N+Msc+Pl:føtt  er-ene ;

LEXICON fROT
     +N+Fem+Sg:rot   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def:roten K     ;
    +N+Fem+Pl:røtt  er-ene ;


LEXICON fGÅS
     +N+Fem+Sg:gås   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def:gåsen K     ;
     +N+Fem+Pl:gjess 0-ene ;

LEXICON fKU
       +N+Fem+Sg:ku   0-a    ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Def:kua  K      ;
   +N+Msc+Sg+Def:kuen K      ;
       +N+Fem+Pl:kyr  0-ne   ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Use/NG:ku   er-ene ;

LEXICON fKLE
 +N+Neu+Sg+Indef:kle    K     ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Def:kledet K     ;
       +N+Neu+Pl:klæ    r-rne ;

LEXICON indeclf 
  +N+Fem+Indef: # ;
!           +N: R ;

! Neuters
! -------

LEXICON nX ! styrbord
 +N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
     +N: R ;

!LEXICON nD ! i live
! +N+Neu+Dat: K ;


!LEXICON n1-e- !
! +N: Re ;

LEXICON n1 ! hus
 +N: R       ;
     n1morph ;

LEXICON n1morph
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et    ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ene-a ;
! +N+Neu+Pl: 0-er-ene-a ; 

LEXICON n1b ! rom
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et    ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:m   0-ene-a ;
        +N:    R       ;

LEXICON n1sg ! yr
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON n1pl ! odds
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ene-a ; ! tribunaler

LEXICON n2 ! eple, salt
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: er-ene-a ;
        +N: R        ;

LEXICON n2b ! program
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et       ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:m   0-er-ene-a ;
        +N:    R          ;

LEXICON n2c ! album, kontor
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et       ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-er-ene-a ;
        +N: R          ;

LEXICON n2s ! mørke
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON n3 ! middel
 +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 er-ene-a ;
        +N:   R        ;

LEXICON n3b ! lager
 +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et    ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 e-ene-a ;
        +N:   R       ;

LEXICON n3c ! fe Dette stemmer ikkje, det er fe-feet-fe-fea/feene
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ne ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON n3d ! søppel
 +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 0-er-ene-a ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON n3e ! skjema
 +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 0-er-ene ;
        +N:   R        ;

LEXICON n3f ! kamfer
 +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:   0-e-ne-a ;
        +N:   R        ;

LEXICON n4 ! kriterium
 +N+Neu+Sg:X5 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X5 er-ene-a ;
        +N:   R        ;

LEXICON n4b ! faktum
 +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X5 a-aene ;
        +N:   R      ;

LEXICON n5 ! middel 
       +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et       ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Use/NG:   0-et       ;
       +N+Neu+Pl:X1 0-er-ene-a ;
              +N:   R          ;

LEXICON n6 ! kammer Dette stemmer ikkje (per 2021), det er kammeret
 +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 0-e-ene-a ;
        +N:   R        ;



LEXICON nFORUM ! forum
 +N+Neu+Sg:um 0-et   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:   a-aene ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Use/NG:um er-ene ;
        +N:um R      ;

LEXICON nLEKSIKON ! leksikon
 +N+Neu+Sg:on 0-et   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:   a-aene ;
        +N:on R      ;

LEXICON nMUSEUM
 +N+Neu+Pl:e   er-ene-a ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Indef:um     K ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Def:et K ;
        +N:um R        ;

LEXICON nØYE
 +N+Neu+Sg:e 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:ne   e-ene ;
        +N:en R        ;

LEXICON nplKLÆR
 +N+Neu+Pl:klær 0-ne  ;

 LEXICON nTRE
 +N+Neu+Sg:e  0-et  ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:æ  r-rne ;

LEXICON nTEMPUS
! tempus:temp TEMPUS ;
          :us     n1 ;
 +N+Neu+Sg:ora    K  ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:oraene K  ;
        +N:us     R  ;

LEXICON fTÅ
 +N+Fem+Sg:tå  0-a  ;
 +N+Msc+Use/NG:tåen # ;
 +N+Fem+Pl:tæ  r-rne ;

LEXICON nplOPPTØYER ! Unlike other neuters: no -a in definite
  +N+Neu+Pl: er-ene ;

! Lexica for definiteness declension
! ==================================

LEXICON a-aene
 +Indef:%>a    K ;
   +Def:%>aene K ;

LEXICON e-ne
 +Indef:%>e  K ;
   +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON e-ene
 +Indef:%>e   K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON e-ene-a
 +Indef:%>e   K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>ene K ;
   +Def:%>a   K ;

LEXICON er-ene
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON e-er-ene
 +Indef+Use/NG:%>e   K ;
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON er-ene-a
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>a   K ;

LEXICON 0-e-ene-a
 +Indef+Use/NG:  K ;
 +Indef:%>e  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>a   K ;

LEXICON 0-e-ne-a
 +Indef+Use/NG:  K ;
 +Indef:%>e  K ;
   +Def:%>ne K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>a   K ;

LEXICON ar-ane	 !! @CODE@ for nynorsk only.
 +Indef:%>ar  K ; !!
   +Def:%>ane K ; !!

LEXICON 0-ane !! @CODE@ for nynorsk only.
 +Indef:      K ;
   +Def:%>ane K ;

LEXICON r-rne  ! trær
 +Indef:%>r   K ;
   +Def:%>rne K ;

! LEXICON r-ne  ! gamledager
!  +Indef:%>r  K ;
!    +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON 0-a
        +Indef:    K ;
          +Def:%>a K ;
! +Def+Radical:%>a K ; ! If needed

LEXICON 0-en
 +Indef:     K ;
   +Def:%>en K ;

LEXICON 0-ene
 +Indef:      K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON 0-er-ene
 +Indef:      K ;
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON 0-er-ene-a
 +Indef:      K ;
 +Indef+Use/NG:%>er  K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>ene K ;
   +Def:%>a   K ;

LEXICON 0-ne
 +Indef:     K ;
   +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON 0-et
 +Indef:     K ;
   +Def:%>et K ;

LEXICON 0-ene-a
        +Indef:      K ;
          +Def+Use/NG:%>ene K ;
          +Def:%>a   K ;
! +Def+Radical:%>a   K ; ! If needed

LEXICON en ! Use 0-en instead
! +Indef:     K ; ! commented out for dict, comment
               ! in again for eventual syntax ("en dør")
    +Def:%>en K ; ! døren = dør+N+Msc :-/

LEXICON 0-e
 +Indef:    K ;
   +Def:%>e K ;

LEXICON e-e
 +Indef:%>e K ;
   +Def:%>e K ;
