src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 3_letter
glo+CmpNP/None:glo fGLO ; 
klo+CmpNP/None:klo fGLO ; 
ski+CmpNP/None:ski f1V ; 
vom+CmpNP/None:vom f1b ; 
øye+CmpNP/None:øy nØYE ; 
LEXICON Noun
fru indeclf ;
grønnever f3 ;
spørreskjema n3e ;
tidsskjema n3e ;
påmeldingsskjema n3e ;
angrefristskjema n3e ;
kulturråd n1 ;
terningpoeng n1 ;
veiledningsmateriell n1 ;
stellerom n1b ;
akterrom n1b ;
bessemerjern n1 ;
spiskammer n6 ;
termometer n6 ;
barometer n6 ;
fadervår n1 ;
kamfer n3f ;
pyttlav n1 ;
off.lov f2 ;
sametingslov f2 ;
folkeregisterlov f2 ;
never f3 ;
årenever f3 ;
hjelpeskjema n3e ;
vurderingsskjema n3e ;
filmarbeid n2 ;
myrområde n2 ;
villeple n2 ;
flytebelte n2 ;
pedanteri n2 ;
histamin n2 ;
rusbehandlingsfelt n2 ;
fostersøster f3b ;
gudsøster f3b ;
sykesøster f3b ;
lillesøster f3b ;
storesøster f3b ;
stesøster f3b ;
halvsøster f3b ;
faster f3 ;
seter f3 ;
gimmer f3 ;
older f3 ;
spinnerblad n3 ;
gruppemiddel n5 ;
likestillingsmiddel n5 ;
transportmiddel n5 ;
hengsel n3 ;
deksel n5 ;
budsjettkapittel n5 ;
flyttesystem n3 ;
informasjonssystem n3 ;
innbo n3 ;
kvalitetsregister n3b ;
kloster n3b ;
kompleks n3 ;
nordområdemuseum:nordområdemuse nMUSEUM ;
samemuseum:samemuse nMUSEUM ;
forvaltningsmuseum:forvaltningsmuse nMUSEUM ;
friluftsmuseum:friluftsmuse nMUSEUM ;
amfibium:amfibi nMUSEUM ;
adverbium n4 ;
prosjektstadium:prosjektstadi nMUSEUM ;
scandium n4 ;
kulturfagstudium n4 ;
universitetsstudium n4 ;
ruthenium n4 ;
europium n4 ;
søvnlaboratorium n4 ;
politikammer n6 ;
kopphåndkle:kopphånd fKLE ;
silketørkle:silketør fKLE ;
tre:tr nTRE ;
lerketre:lerketr nTRE ;
bøketre:bøketr nTRE ;
hylletre:hylletr nTRE ;
bogtre:bogtr nTRE ;
sedertre:sedertr nTRE ;
løvtre:løvtr nTRE ;
forum:for nFORUM ;
kvinneforum:kvinnefor nFORUM ;
kompetanseforum:kompetansefor nFORUM ;
dialogforum:dialogfor nFORUM ;
språkforum:språkfor nFORUM ;
mineralforum:mineralfor nFORUM ;
trafikksikkerhetsforum:trafikksikkerhetsfor nFORUM ;
leksikon:leksik nLEKSIKON ;
hovedleksikon:hovedleksik nLEKSIKON ;
brukerleksikon:brukerleksik nLEKSIKON ;
tilleggsleksikon:tilleggsleksik nLEKSIKON ;
oppdateringsleksikon:oppdateringsleksik nLEKSIKON ;
onomatopoetikon:onomatopoetik nLEKSIKON ;
ørneklo fGLO ;
saueklo fGLO ;
dreggklo fGLO ;
filklo fGLO ;
guddatter:gud fDATTER ;
pleiedatter:pleie fDATTER ;
sønnedatter:sønne fDATTER ;
stedatter:ste fDATTER ;
svigerdatter:sviger fDATTER ;
fosterdatter:foster fDATTER ;
kongsdatter:kongs fDATTER ;
alenemor:alene fMOR ;
gudmor:gud fMOR ;
tippoldemor:tippolde fMOR ;
perlemor:perle fMOR ;
vågmor:våg fMOR ;
fostermor:foster fMOR ;
husmor:hus fMOR ;
mammaklær:mamma nplKLÆR ;
håndklær:hånd nplKLÆR ;
skoleklær:skole nplKLÆR ;
dongeriklær:dongeri nplKLÆR ;
ytterklær:ytter nplKLÆR ;
åklær:å nplKLÆR ;
tempus:temp nTEMPUS ;
canadagås:canada fGÅS ;
sædgås:sæd fGÅS ;
dverggås:dverg fGÅS ;
grågås:grå fGÅS ;
fot: mFOT ;
versefot:verse mFOT ;
framfot:fram mFOT ;
mellomfot:mellom mFOT ;
gipsfot:gips mFOT ;
håndrot:hånd fROT ;
trerot:tre fROT ;
gulrot:gul fROT ;
pepperrot:pepper fROT ;
melkeku:melke fKU ;
splittkeinski f1V ;
hoppski f1V ;
vedski f1V ;
bandsko f1V ;
spissmus f1V ;
stellerand f1X ;
venstrehånd f1X ;
nidstang f1X ;
nettordbok f1X ;
engelskbok f1X ;
løvetann f1X ;
friksjonskraft f1X ;
babord nX ;
meänkieli nX ;
verbo nX ;
diablo nX ;
pimiento nX ;
ly nX ;
skam f1b ;
centigram n1b ;
sykehjem n1b ;
fryserom n1b ;
kontorrom n1b ;
utdanningssentrum n1b ;
termogram n2b ;
planprogram n2b ;
polarforskningsprogram n2b ;
partnerskapsprogram n2b ;
landsstyremedlem n2b ;
driftskjøretøy n2b ;
bedriftsmiljø n2b ;
boligvirkemiddel n5 ;
møteplager n3b ;
alter n3b ;
utviklingssenter n3b ;
identitetssenter n3b ;
læremiddelsenter n3 ;
foster n3b ;
skatteforum n4b ;
utviklingsforum n4b ;
diskusjonsforum n4b ;
faktum n4b ;
kvantum n4b ;
tillitsvotum n4b ;
passivum n4b ;
egenvurderingsskjema n3e ;
advokatfirma n2c ;
etablererstipend n2c ;
problem n2c ;
tannlegekontor n2c ;
byplankontor n2c ;
ligningskontor n2c ;
idrettskontor n2c ;
storfe n3c ;
fjørfe n3c ;
bufe n3c ;
småfe n3c ;
pulver n3c ;
nummer+N+Neu+Pl:numre 0-ne ;
fjærfe n1sg ;
ferskvannsfiske n1sg ;
kriminalpoliti n1sg ;
materiell n1sg ;
sennegras n1sg ;
tusmørke n2s ;
fiske n2s ;
loddefiske n2s ;
heimefiske n2s ;
bankfiske n2s ;
vårfiske n2s ;
tyvfiske n2s ;
skrivestøtte f2 ;
kråketå:kråke fTÅ ;
lilletå:lille fTÅ ;
stortå:stor fTÅ ;
direktestøtte f2 ;
barhytte f2 ;
skrivegruppe f2 ;
odds n1pl ;
rompe f2 ;
kaliber n6 ;
snømus f1V ;
begynnerbok f1X ;
kjølemiddel n5 ;
fiskemel n1sg ;
imperfektum nX ;
lavsko f1V ;
mylder n6 ;
sonoffer n6 ;
svømmefot:svømme mFOT ;
opptøyer:opptøy nplOPPTØYER ;
raseopptøyer:raseopptøy nplOPPTØYER ;
hvitkinngås:hvitkinn fGÅS  ;
flyttefot:flytte mFOT ;
kvannerot:kvanne fROT ;
tannrot:tann fROT ;
gjeldku:gjeld fKU  ;
elgku:elg fKU ;
småord n1pl ;
kuvom f1b ;
nasjonalmuseum:nasjonalmuse nMUSEUM ;
krepseklo fGLO ;
kanadagås:kanada fGÅS ;
snøgås:snø fGÅS ;
enkelteventyr n1sg ;
hårtap n1 ;
grasrot:gras fROT ;
underklær:under nplKLÆR ;
